Hawaii statutes.
§46-88 Agricultural buildings and
structures; exemptions from building permit and building code requirements. (a)
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the following agricultural buildings,
structures, and appurtenances thereto that are not used as dwellings or lodging
units are exempt from building permit and building code requirements where they
are no more than one thousand square feet in floor area:

(1) Nonresidential manufactured pre-engineered
commercial buildings and structures;

(2) Single stand alone recycled ocean shipping or
cargo containers that are used as nonresidential commercial buildings and are
properly anchored;

(3) Notwithstanding the one thousand square foot
floor area restriction, agricultural shade cloth structures, cold frames, or
greenhouses not exceeding twenty thousand square feet in area per structure;
provided that where multiple structures are erected, the minimum horizontal
separation between each shade cloth structure, cold frame, or greenhouse is
fifteen feet;

(4) Aquacultural or aquaponics structures, including
above-ground water storage or production tanks, troughs, and raceways with a
maximum height of six feet above grade, and in-ground ponds and raceways, and
piping systems for aeration, carbon dioxide, or fertilizer or crop protection
chemical supplies within agricultural or aquacultural production facilities;

(5) Livestock watering tanks, water piping and
plumbing not connected to a source of potable water, or separated by an air gap
from such a source;

(6) Non-masonry fences not exceeding ten feet in
height and masonry fences not exceeding six feet in height;

(7) One-story masonry or wood-framed buildings or
structures with a structural span of less than twenty-five feet and a total
square footage of no more than one thousand square feet, including farm
buildings used as:

(A) Barns;

(B) Greenhouses;

(C) Farm production buildings including
aquaculture hatcheries and plant nurseries;

(D) Storage buildings for farm equipment or
plant or animal supplies or feed; or

(E) Storage or processing buildings for
crops; provided that the height of any stored items shall not collectively
exceed twelve feet in height;

(8) Raised beds containing soil, gravel, cinders, or
other growing media or substrates with wood, metal, or masonry walls or
supports with a maximum height of four feet;

(9) Horticultural tables or benches no more than four
feet in height supporting potted plants or other crops; and

(10) Nonresidential indigenous Hawaiian hale that do
not exceed five hundred square feet in size, have no kitchen or bathroom, and
are used for traditional agricultural activities or education;

provided that the buildings, structures, and
appurtenances thereto comply with all applicable state and county zoning codes.

(b) Notwithstanding the one thousand square
foot floor area restriction in subsection (a), the following buildings,
structures, and appurtenances thereto shall be exempt from building permit
requirements when compliant with relevant building codes or county, national,
or international prescriptive construction standards:

(1) Nonresidential manufactured pre-engineered and
county pre-approved commercial buildings and structures consisting of a total
square footage greater than one thousand square feet but no more than eight
thousand square feet; and

(2) One-story wood-framed or masonry buildings or
structures with a structural span of less than twenty-five feet and a total
square footage greater than one thousand square feet but no more than eight
thousand square feet constructed in accordance with county, national, or
international prescriptive construction standards, including buildings used as:

(A) Barns;

(B) Greenhouses;

(C) Farm production buildings, including
aquaculture hatcheries and plant nurseries;

(D) Storage buildings for farm equipment,
plant or animal supplies, or feed; or

(E) Storage or processing buildings for
crops; provided that the height of any stored items shall not collectively
exceed twelve feet in height.

(c) The exemptions in subsections (a) and (b)
shall apply; provided that:

(1) The aggregate floor area of the exempted
agricultural buildings shall not exceed:

(A) Five thousand square feet per zoning lot
for lots of two acres or less;

(B) Eight thousand square feet per zoning lot
for lots greater than two acres but not more than five acres; and

(C) Eight thousand square feet plus two per
cent of the acreage per zoning lot for lots greater than five acres; provided
that each exempted agricultural building is compliant with the square foot area
restrictions in subsection (a) or subsection (b);

(2) The minimum horizontal separation between each
agricultural building, structure, or appurtenance thereto is fifteen feet;

(3) The agricultural buildings, structures, or
appurtenances thereto are located on a commercial farm or ranch and are used
for general agricultural or aquacultural operations, or for purposes incidental
to such operations;

(4) The agricultural buildings, structures, or
appurtenances thereto are constructed or installed on property that is used
primarily for agricultural or aquacultural operations, and is two or more
contiguous acres in area or one or more contiguous acres in area if located in
a nonresidential agricultural or aquacultural park;

(5) Upon completion of construction or installation,
the owner or occupier shall provide written notice to the appropriate county
fire department and county building permitting agency of the size, type, and
locations of the building, structure, or appurtenance thereto. Such written
notification shall be provided to the county agencies within thirty days of the
completion of the building, structure, or appurtenance thereto. Failure to
provide such written notice may void the building permit or building code
exemption, or both, which voidance for such failure is subject to the sole
discretion of the appropriate county building permitting agency;

(6) No electrical power and no plumbing systems shall
be connected to the building or structure without first obtaining the appropriate
county electrical or plumbing permit, and all such installations shall be
installed under the supervision of a licensed electrician or plumber, as
appropriate, and inspected and approved by an appropriate county or licensed
inspector or, if a county building agency is unable to issue an electrical
permit because the building or structure is permit-exempt, an electrical permit
shall be issued for an electrical connection to a meter on a pole beyond the
permit-exempt structure in accordance with the installation, inspection, and
approval requirements in this paragraph;

(7) Disposal of wastewater from any building or
structure constructed or installed pursuant to this section shall comply with
chapter 342D; and

(8) Permit-exempt structures shall be exempt from any
certificate of occupancy requirements.

(d) As used in this section:

"Agricultural building" means a
nonresidential building or structure, built for agricultural or aquacultural
purposes, located on a commercial farm or ranch constructed or installed to
house farm or ranch implements, agricultural or aquacultural feeds or supplies,
livestock, poultry, or other agricultural or aquacultural products, used in or
necessary for the operation of the farm or ranch, or for the processing and selling
of farm or ranch products.

"Agricultural operation" means the
planting, cultivating, harvesting, processing, or storage of crops, including
those planted, cultivated, harvested, and processed for food, ornamental,
grazing, feed, or forestry purposes, as well as the feeding, breeding,
management, and sale of animals including livestock, poultry, honeybees, and
their products.

"Appurtenance" means an object or
device in, on, or accessory to a building or structure, and which enhances or
is essential to the usefulness of the building or structure, including but not
limited to work benches, horticultural and floricultural growing benches,
aquacultural, aquaponic, and hydroponic tanks, raceways, troughs, growbeds, and
filterbeds, when situated within a structure.

"Aquacultural operation" means the
propagation, cultivation, farming, harvesting, processing, and storage of
aquatic plants and animals in controlled or selected environments for research,
commercial, or stocking purposes and includes aquaponics or any growing of
plants or animals in or with aquaculture effluents.

"Manufactured pre-engineered commercial
building or structure" means a building or structure whose specifications
comply with appropriate county codes, and have been pre-approved by a county or
building official.

"Nonresidential building or
structure" means a building or structure, including an agricultural
building, that is used only for agricultural or aquacultural operations and is
not intended for use as, or used as, a dwelling.

(e) This section shall not apply to buildings
or structures otherwise exempted from building permitting or building code
requirements by applicable county ordinance.

(f) This section shall not be construed to
supersede public or private lease conditions.

(g) This section shall not apply to the
construction or installation of any building or structure on land in an urban
district.

(h) The State or any county shall not be
liable for claims arising from the construction of agricultural buildings,
structures, or appurtenances thereto exempt from the building code and
permitting process as described in this section, unless the claim arises out of
gross negligence or intentional misconduct by the State or county.

(i) This section shall not apply to buildings
or structures used to store pesticides or other hazardous material unless
stored in accordance with federal and state law.

(j) Failure to comply with the conditions of
this section shall result in penalties consistent with county building
department provisions. [L 2012, c 114, §2; am L 2013, c 203, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next